Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.033

Appeal of court order—Procedure—Priority, when.

(1) Any person aggrieved by a final order of the court may appeal the order as provided by this section. All appeals in matters other than those related to commission of a juvenile offense shall be taken in the same manner as in other civil cases. Except as otherwise provided in this title, all appeals in matters related to the commission of a juvenile offense shall be taken in the same manner as criminal cases and the right to collateral relief shall be the same as in criminal cases. The order of the juvenile court shall stand pending the disposition of the appeal: PROVIDED, That the court or the appellate court may upon application stay the order.

(2) If the final order from which an appeal is taken grants the custody of the child to, or withholds it from, any of the parties, or if the child is committed as provided under this chapter, the appeal shall be given priority in hearing.

(3) In the absence of a specific direction from the party seeking review to file the notice, or the court-appointed guardian ad litem, the court may dismiss the review pursuant to RAP 18.9. To the extent that this enactment [1990 c 284] conflicts with the requirements of RAP 5.3(a) or RAP 5.3(b) this enactment [1990 c 284] shall supersede the conflicting rule.

[ 1990 c 284 s 35; 1979 c 155 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 5.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Finding—Effective date—1990 c 284: See notes following RCW 74.13.250.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.